Rhode Island, session 2025, SB806.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-155-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-155 entitled "Quasi-
Public Corporations Accountability and Transparency Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-155-6. Transparency requirements established.
The following shall be public, and available to the public upon request and posted directly,
or via direct link, on the website of each quasi-public corporation:
(1) Job descriptions of the executive director and management;
(2) Compensation comparability studies of the executive and senior management, and
current and approved salaries;
(3) Quarterly financial statements;
(4) Capital improvement plans;
(5) Operating budgets;
(6) Strategic plan;
(7) Agendas and minutes of the open meetings of the board, including all documents to be
discussed at an open meeting of a public body shall be posted or linked with the electronic filing
of the agenda submitted to the secretary of state pursuant to § 42-46-6;
(8) Quarterly contracting reports and annual contracting reports required by § 42-90-1;
(9) Regulations adopted by the quasi-public corporation;
(10) Enabling legislation;

(11) Mission statement;
(12) Board members;
(13) Organizational chart and list of current salaries of positions;
(14) Bylaws of the quasi-public corporation;
(15) All reports and audits required by this chapter or other general laws; and
(16) Any and all policies and procedures established by the board members established
under § 42-155-4(b).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002374
========
LC002374 - Page 2 of 3